Rhode Island statutes. Title 41 Sports, Racing, and Athletics
Chapter 4 Mutuel Betting and License Fees

41-4-1.
Meets at which betting authorized — Types of mutuels.

The division of gaming and athletics licensing may permit at racing events, licensed under the provisions of chapter 3 of this title, betting under pari-mutuel system, so-called, or auction mutuel system, so-called, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

Events run under Class A shall be conducted under the pari-mutuel system only.

Events run under Classes B, C, and E shall be conducted under the pari-mutuel or auction mutuel system as the division may determine.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 12; P.L. 1942, ch. 1212, art. 11, § 1; P.L. 1944, ch. 1449, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1887, art. 8, § 1; P.L. 1951, ch. 2733, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 3026, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3150, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3254, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3521, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3739, art. 3, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

41-4-1

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 44, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1958, ch. 17, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 147; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 4.

41-4-2.
Betting only at track — Minors prohibited.

The pari-mutuel system, so-called, or other form of betting system authorized by this chapter, shall not be used or permitted at any location other than the race track at which the horse racing event is licensed to be conducted. No licensee shall knowingly permit any minor to be a patron of the pari-mutuel system or other betting system authorized by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

41-4-2

; P.L. 1958, ch. 17, art. 6, § 1.

41-4-3.
Tax on pari-mutuel betting.

Each licensee conducting racing events under the pari-mutuel system shall pay to the state, and there is hereby imposed:

A tax at the rate of three percent (3%) of the total money wagered on so-called straight (win, place, or show) wagering on the events; and

A tax at the rate of six percent (6%) of the total money wagered on so-called exotic or multiple forms of wagering on the events; and

A tax equal to one-half (1/2) of the breakage to the dime resulting from the wagering.

Each licensee conducting harness horse racing events under the pari-mutuel system shall pay to the state, and there is hereby imposed:

A tax at the rate of five and one-half percent (5.5%) of so much of the total amount of money wagered daily on the events as does not exceed four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000); six and three quarters percent (6.75%) of so much thereof as exceeds four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000), but does not exceed four hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($450,000); seven and one quarter percent (7.25%) of so much thereof as exceeds four hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($450,000), but does not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000); and ten percent (10%) of so much of the total amount of money wagered on the events as exceeds five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000);

A tax equal to one-half (1/2) of the breakage to the dime resulting from the wagering.

Each licensee conducting dog racing events under the pari-mutuel system shall pay to the state, and there is hereby imposed, a tax on such events at the rate of:

Five and one-half percent (5.5%) of the first one hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) of money wagered daily; plus nine percent (9%) on amounts wagered from one hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to two hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($250,000); plus ten and one quarter percent (10.25%) on amounts wagered from two hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) to three hundred and seventy-five thousand dollars ($375,000); plus ten and three quarters percent (10.75%) on amounts wagered over three hundred and seventy-five thousand dollars ($375,000); and

One-half (1/2) of the breakage to the dime resulting from the wagering.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 12; P.L. 1942, ch. 1212, art. 11, § 1; P.L. 1944, ch. 1449, § 1; P.L. 1945, ch. 1567, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 1946, ch. 1718, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1887, art. 8, § 1; P.L. 1951, ch. 2733, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 3026, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3150, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3254, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3521, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3739, art. 3, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

41-4-3

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 44, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1958, ch. 17, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 1964, ch. 242, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 114, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 222, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 49, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 147, § 1.

41-4-4.
Licensee’s commission under pari-mutuel system.

Each licensee under the pari-mutuel system may retain as the licensee’s commission:

Not to exceed sixteen percent (16%) of the total amount of money wagered on so-called straight (win, place, or show) wagering on events; and

Not to exceed eighteen percent (18%) of the total amount of money wagered on so-called exotic or multiple forms of wagering on the events, and one-half (1/2) of the breakage to the dime resulting from the wagering.

Each licensee conducting a harness horse racing meeting under the pari-mutuel system may retain as the licensee’s commission:

Not to exceed eleven and one-half percent (11.5%) of so much of the total amount of money wagered daily on the events as does not exceed four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000); ten and one quarter percent (10.25%) of so much thereof as exceeds four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000), but does not exceed four hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($450,000); nine and three quarters percent (9.75%) of so much thereof as exceeds four hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($450,000), but does not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000); and seven percent (7%) of so much of the total amount of money wagered on the events as exceeds five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000); and

One-half (1/2) of the breakage to the dime resulting from the wagering.

Each licensee conducting dog racing events under the pari-mutuel system may retain as the licensee’s commission an amount not to exceed:

Eleven and one-half percent (11.5%) of the first one hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) of money wagered daily; plus eight percent (8%) on amounts wagered from one hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to two hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($250,000); plus six and three quarters percent (6.75%) on amounts wagered from two hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) to three hundred and seventy-five thousand dollars ($375,000); plus six and one quarter percent (6.25%) on amounts wagered over three hundred and seventy-five thousand dollars ($375,000); and

One-half (1/2) of the breakage to the dime resulting from the wagering.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 12; P.L. 1942, ch. 1212, art. 11, § 1; P.L. 1944, ch. 1449, § 1; P.L. 1945, ch. 1567, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 1946, ch. 1718, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1887, art. 8, § 1; P.L. 1951, ch. 2733, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 3026, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3150, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3254, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3521, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3739, art. 3, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

41-4-4

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 44, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1958, ch. 17, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 1964, ch. 242, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 114, § 2; P.L. 1971, ch. 222, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 49, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 147, § 1.

41-4-4.1.
Support of division activities — Tax.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

41-4-3

or §

41-3.1-6

, each licensee conducting racing events under the pari-mutuel system shall collect an additional five percent (5%) of all money wagered on the multiple pools at racing tracks. “Multiple pools” shall be defined as all forms of wagering other than win, place, and show. This five-percent (5%) tax shall be over and above the schedule of taxes as set forth in §

41-4-3

, and shall be distributed as follows:

One and one-half percent (1.5%) shall be paid to the department of business regulation and these proceeds shall be deposited as general revenue.

One-half of one percent (.5%) shall be paid to owners of dog kennels who are under contract with a licensee, who shall distribute funds to the owners of dog kennels in a manner consistent with the generally accepted distribution of dog kennel owners’ purses subject to an annual audit by the auditor general, or his or her designee.

One and one-half percent (1.5%) shall be paid to the licensee provided that there is at least three hundred forty (340) scheduled performances during the calendar year.

One and one-half percent (1.5%) shall be paid to the state and revert to the general fund.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

41-3.1-6

, each licensee conducting racing events under the pari-mutuel system shall collect an additional four percent (4%) of all moneys wagered on so-called straight (win, place, or show) wagering. This four percent (4%) tax shall be over and above the schedule of taxes as set forth in §

41-3.1-6

, and shall be distributed as follows:

One percent (1%) shall be paid to the town of Lincoln;

One percent (1%) shall be paid to owners of dog kennels who are under contract with a licensee, who shall distribute funds to the owners of dog kennels in a manner consistent with the generally accepted distribution of dog kennel owners’ purses subject to an annual audit by the auditor general, or his or her designee; and

Two percent (2%) shall be paid to the state and revert to the general fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 25, § 4; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 15, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 28, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 97, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 26, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 125; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 13, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 441, § 25; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 36.

41-4-5.
Taxes and license fees under auction mutuel system.

If events are conducted under the auction mutuel system the following taxes and license fees are hereby imposed:

As to Class B events, a tax of two percent (2%) of the total amount of money wagered and also a license fee of two hundred dollars ($200) per day;

As to Class C events, a tax of one and one-half percent (1.5%) of the total amount of money wagered and also a license fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) per day;

As to Class E events, a tax of one percent (1%) of the total amount of money wagered and also a license fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) per day.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 12; P.L. 1942, ch. 1212, art. 11, § 1; P.L. 1944, ch. 1449, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1887, art. 8, § 1; P.L. 1951, ch. 2733, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 3026, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3150, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3254, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3521, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3739, art. 3, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

41-4-5

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 44, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1960, ch. 74, § 19.

41-4-6.
Licensee’s commission under auction mutuel system.

Each licensee under the auction mutuel system may retain, as the licensee’s commission, not to exceed five percent (5%) of the total amount of money wagered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 12; P.L. 1942, ch. 1212, art. 11, § 1; P.L. 1944, ch. 1449, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1887, art. 8, § 1; P.L. 1951, ch. 2733, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 3026, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3150, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3254, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3521, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3739, art. 3, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

41-4-6

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 44, art. 3, § 1.

41-4-7.
Class D license fee.

Events run under Class D shall pay a fee not exceeding ten dollars ($10.00) per day; provided, however, that no wagering of any sort shall be allowed at the events.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 12; P.L. 1942, ch. 1212, art. 11, § 1; P.L. 1944, ch. 1449, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1887, art. 8, § 1; P.L. 1951, ch. 2733, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 3026, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3150, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3254, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3521, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3739, art. 3, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

41-4-7

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 44, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1960, ch. 74, § 19.

41-4-8.
Collection of taxes — Interest on delinquencies — Failure to pay on demand.

The tax administrator shall assess and collect the taxes imposed by this chapter under such rules and regulations as he or she may prescribe. All taxes hereby imposed shall be due and payable at the close of each day’s racing and any tax not paid upon demand of the tax administrator shall bear interest at the rate of six percent (6%) per annum from the time of the demand. Failure to pay any tax upon demand shall be cause for revocation of a license.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 12; P.L. 1942, ch. 1212, art. 11, § 1; P.L. 1944, ch. 1449, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1887, art. 8, § 1; P.L. 1951, ch. 2733, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 3026, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3150, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3254, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3521, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3739, art. 3, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

41-4-8

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 44, art. 3, § 1.

41-4-9.
Accounting system — Supervision of betting.

The division of gaming and athletics licensing shall devise a system of accounting and shall supervise betting at a track in a manner so that the rights of the state are protected, and shall collect all fees and licenses under rules and regulations as it shall prescribe.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 12; P.L. 1942, ch. 1212, art. 11, § 1; P.L. 1944, ch. 1449, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1887, art. 8, § 1; P.L. 1951, ch. 2733, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 3026, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3150, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3254, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3521, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3739, art. 3, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

41-4-9

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 44, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 4.

41-4-9.1.
Licensing of concessioners, vendors, and pari-mutuel totalizator companies.

All persons, firms, partnerships, associations, or corporations desiring to operate any concession allied to any dog racing track, shall apply for a license to the division of gaming and athletics licensing, on such forms and in such a manner as prescribed by regulations of the division. The division, by regulations, shall establish other occupational licensing for all employees of the concessions, all pari-mutuel employees, and all persons employed in any other capacity by the race track management, and for other persons engaged in racing activities at any dog racing track.

All persons, firms, associations, or corporations employed by the management of a dog racing track in providing pari-mutuel totalizator computer services for pari-mutuel computations, shall apply for a license to the division of gaming and athletics licensing upon such forms and in such manner prescribed by regulations of the division. All employees of the pari-mutuel totalizator computer companies shall be licensed by the division on forms prescribed by regulations of the division.

In determining whether to grant a license pursuant to this section, the division may require the applicant to submit information as to: financial standing and credit; moral character; criminal record, if any; previous employment; corporate, partnership, or association affiliations; ownership of personal assets; and such other information as it deems pertinent to the issuance of the license. The division may reject, for good cause, an application for a license, and it may suspend or revoke, for good cause, any license issued by it after a hearing held in accordance with chapter 35 of title 42 and subject to further appeal procedures provided by §

41-2-3

.

The division shall issue a three-year (3) license commencing with license year 2007. The division shall implement a graduated system in 2007 where one-third of licenses due to expire shall be renewed for one year; a second third of licenses due to expire shall be renewed for two (2) years; and the final third of licenses due to expire shall be renewed for three (3) years, with licensing fees prorated accordingly. As licenses become due for renewal, licenses shall be renewed for a three-year (3) period of time. All licenses issued shall be in accordance with regulations and the following schedule:

For gaming facility employees: (A) Key employees$300.00 (B) Operation employees$150.00 (C) Service employees$75.00 (2) For gaming facility non-employees: (A) Concessionaires and vendors:$750.00 (B) Occupational licenses: Owners450.00 Trainers150.00 Assumed names150.00 Kennel people75.00 (C) Concessionaire and vendor’s employees75.00 (D) Pari-mutuel totalizator companies750.00 (E) Pari-mutuel totalizator company employees150.00

All individual applicants for licensing under this section shall be fingerprinted, and, upon obtaining the license, shall wear upon his or her outer apparel a photo identification badge, issued or authorized by the division of gaming and athletics licensing under rules and regulations promulgated by the division.

The cost of the licensing pursuant to this section shall be paid by the employer of the licensee, and shall include one hundred and fifty percent (150%) of the total salaries and benefits for the state employees engaged in the licensing at each facility. The fund shall be deposited as restricted receipts for the use of the state and shall be in addition to any taxes and fees otherwise payable to the state.

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 307, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 409, § 4; P.L. 1991, ch. 185, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 62, § 8; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 41, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 4.

41-4-10.
Unclaimed winnings.

The amount of unclaimed money, as determined by the division of gaming and athletics licensing, now held or that shall hereafter be held by any licensee, on account of outstanding and un-cashed winning tickets, shall, at the expiration of one year after the close of the meeting during which the tickets were issued, be collected forthwith from the licensee by the division and shall be paid over to the general treasurer for the use of the state and all unclaimed money shall be held in an escrow account by the licensee until collected by the division.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 12; P.L. 1942, ch. 1212, art. 11, § 1; P.L. 1944, ch. 1449, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1887, art. 8, § 1; P.L. 1951, ch. 2733, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 3026, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3150, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3254, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3521, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3739, art. 3, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

41-4-10

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 44, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 4.

41-4-11.
Entry of premises for inspection of operations.

The division of gaming and athletics licensing may authorize members of the division, or duly authorized deputies, to enter upon the premises at any racing event for the purpose of inspecting books and records; supervising and examining cashiers, ticket sellers, pool sellers, and other persons handling money at the event; and other supervision as may be necessary for the maintenance of order at the event.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 16; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1746, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

41-4-11

; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 4.

41-4-12.
Monthly statement of receipts — Payments to treasurer.

The division of gaming and athletics licensing shall, on or before the tenth day of each month, prepare and file with the general treasurer a full and complete statement of its receipts from all sources, and shall turn over to the general treasurer all moneys in its possession.

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 14; P.L. 1942, ch. 1212, art. 11, § 2; P.L. 1944, ch. 1449, § 2; P.L. 1945, ch. 1567, art. 4, § 2; P.L. 1946, ch. 1718, § 2; P.L. 1947, ch. 1887, art. 8, § 1; P.L. 1951, ch. 2733, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 3026, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3150, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3254, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3521, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3739, art. 3, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

41-4-12

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 44, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 4.

41-4-13.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1934, ch. 2086, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 12, § 14; P.L. 1942, ch. 1212, art. 11, § 2; P.L. 1944, ch. 1449, § 2; P.L. 1945, ch. 1567, art. 4, § 2; P.L. 1946, ch. 1718, § 2; P.L. 1947, ch. 1887, art. 8, § 1; P.L. 1951, ch. 2733, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 3026, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3150, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3254, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3521, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3739, art. 3, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

41-4-13

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 44, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1958, ch. 17, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 1964, ch. 242, art. 6, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 114, § 3; P.L. 1971, ch. 222, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 7, § 4, effective June 22, 1987.

41-4-14.
Dog racing — Distribution of pari-mutuel pool to communities where tracks located.

After deducting the commission and the “breaks,” as required by law, a pari-mutuel pool shall be redistributed to the contributors. The licensee of a dog track shall pay a tax to the state of five and one-half percent (5.5%) of the amounts contributed to the mutuel pool. The licensee shall pay a tax of one-half of one percent (.5%) of such pool to each city or town within whose borders the racing facility or any portion thereof, including parking areas, storage areas, buildings, and entrances or exits to or from the property being used in conjunction with the operation of dog racing, is located.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 229, § 1.

41-4-14.1.
Local approval.

Section

41-4-14

shall take effect upon the approval of the voters of any city or town voting on the question allowing the sport of dog racing, subject, however, to an affirmative vote as provided in chapter 9 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 229, § 2; P.L. 1981, ch. 233, § 3.